Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-805
Appeal; procedure.

An applicant, feeling himself or herself aggrieved by the endorsement made upon his or her application, may take an appeal therefrom to the district court of the county in which the proposed works may be situated. Such appeal shall otherwise be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, § 5, p. 858;

C.S.1922, § 8484;

C.S.1929, § 81-6405;

R.S.1943, § 81-706;

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 18, p. 1240;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 81.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

On appeal to the district court, trial is de novo. Lackaff v. Department of Roads & Irrigation, 153 Neb. 217, 43 N.W.2d 576 (1950).